Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
663J]

LIABILITY
FOR COERCION INTO PROSTITUTION

Section

663J-1 Title

663J-2 Definitions

663J-3 Cause of action for coercion into
prostitution

or sex trafficking

663J-4 Evidence

663J-5 Damages

663J-6 Joinder of parties

663J-7 Statute of limitations

663J-8 Stay of action

663J-9 Other remedies preserved

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next